Hawaii statutes.
§302L-3.5 Advisory board meetings by
teleconference. (a) Notwithstanding any law to contrary, the advisory
board may meet by teleconference.

(b) Each member of the advisory board
participating in a meeting by teleconference shall be considered present at the
meeting for purposes of determining quorum and participating in all
proceedings.

(c) A meeting by teleconference:

(1) Need not have a quorum present at any one
location; and

(2) Is subject to the notice requirements applicable
to other advisory board meetings.

(d) The notice of each teleconference meeting
shall specify all physical locations from which members of the advisory board
will participate. The notice shall also specify the physical location from
which the presiding officer of the advisory board will preside. All physical
teleconference locations shall be open to the public during the open portion of
the meeting.

(e) Advisory board materials that are to be
considered at the meeting shall be made available at all physical teleconference
locations.

(f) Each part of the teleconference meeting
that is required to be open to the public shall be audible to the public at
each physical location specified in the notice of the meeting.

(g) Except when voice votes are authorized,
the vote shall be conducted in such a manner that the public may know the vote
of each person entitled to vote. The vote at a meeting held by teleconference
shall be taken by roll call.

(h) The public shall be allowed to participate
and speak at a meeting conducted by teleconference in the same manner and to
the same extent that the public is allowed to participate and speak at each
physical site of the meeting. [L 2010, c 63, §1; am L 2012, c 178, §12]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next